Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 12. Miscellaneous.

§79-29-1201.
Construction and application.

The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this chapter.

It is the policy of this chapter to give the maximum effect to the principle of freedom of contract and to the enforceability of operating agreements.

Unless the context otherwise requires, as used herein, the singular shall include the plural and the plural may refer to the singular.The captions contained herein are for the purposes of convenience only and shall not control or affect the construction of this chapter.

As used herein, the words “include,” “includes” and “including” will be deemed to be followed by the phrase “without limitation,” whether or not such phrase is included therein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 84; Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-1201 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 84, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to chapter construction and application. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-1202.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-1202. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 85, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-1202 was entitled: Severability. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1205.

§79-29-1203.
Fees; funding of Office of Secretary of State expenses; deposit of user charges and fees authorized under this section into State General Fund and use of monies so deposited.

No document required to be filed under this chapter shall be effective until the applicable fee required by this section is paid. The following fees shall be paid to and collected by the Secretary of State for the use of the State of Mississippi:

Filing of Reservation of Limited Liability Company Name or Transfer or Cancellation of Reservation, Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).

[Reserved]

[Reserved]

Filing of Certificate of Formation, Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

Filing of Amendment to Certificate of Formation, Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

Filing of Certificate of Dissolution, Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

Filing of Application for Registration of Foreign Limited Liability Company, Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) and Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each day, but not to exceed a total of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each year the foreign limited liability company transacts business in this state without a registration as a foreign limited liability company.

Filing of Certificate of Correction, Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

Filing of Certificate of Cancellation of Registration of Foreign Limited Liability Company, Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

Filing of an Annual Report of Domestic Limited Liability Company, (no fee).

Filing of an Annual Report of Foreign Limited Liability Company, to be deposited in the Elections Support Fund created in Section 23-15-5, Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).

Certificate of Administrative Dissolution, (no fee).

Filing of Application for Reinstatement Following Administrative Dissolution, Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

Certificate of Administrative Revocation of Authority to Transact Business, (no fee).

Filing of Application for Reinstatement Following Administrative Revocation, One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

Certificate of Reinstatement Following Administrative Dissolution, (no fee).

Certificate of Reinstatement Following Administrative Revocation of Authority to Transact Business, (no fee).

Filing of Certificate of Revocation of Dissolution, Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).

Application for Certificate of Existence or Authorization, Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).

Any other document required or permitted to be filed under this chapter, Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).

The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) each time process is served on the Secretary of State under Section 79-29-101 et seq.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees for copying and certifying the copy of any filed document relating to a domestic or foreign limited liability company:

One Dollar ($1.00) a page for copying; and

Ten Dollars ($10.00) for the certificate.

The Secretary of State may promulgate rules to:

Reduce the filing fees set forth in this section or provide for discounts of fees as set forth in this section to encourage online filing of documents or for other reasons as determined by the Secretary of State; and

Provide for documents to be filed and accepted on an expedited basis upon the request of the applicant. The Secretary of State may promulgate rules to provide for an additional reasonable filing fee to be paid by the applicant and collected by the Secretary of State for the expedited filing services.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of the Office of Secretary of State shall be defrayed by line item appropriation from the State General Fund to the Office of Secretary of State and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law and as determined by the State Fiscal Officer, and shall not be authorized for expenditure by the Secretary of State to reimburse or otherwise defray the expenses of any office administered by the Secretary of State.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 86; Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 368, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 122; Laws, 2014, ch. 468, § 8; Laws, 2015, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).

Section 122 of ch. 382, Laws of 2012, effective from and after January 1, 2013, amended this section. Section 1 of ch. 368, Laws of 2012, effective July 1, 2012, also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 122 of ch. 382, Laws of 2012, pursuant to
Section 1-3-79 which provides that whenever the same section of law is amended by different bills during the same legislative session, the amendment with the latest effective date shall supersede all other amendments to the same section taking effect on an earlier date.

A former
§ 79-29-1203 [ Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 86, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to fees. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

The first 2012 amendment (ch. 368), substituted “Secretary of State” for “Secretary” in (4)(a) and (b); and extended the repealer provision from “July 1, 2012” to “July 1, 2015” in (5).

The second 2012 amendment (ch. 382), effective January 1, 2013, deleted (1)(b) and (c), which provided fees for filing a change of address of registered agent and filing a resignation of registered agent, respectively, and reserved both paragraph designators; added “of State” following “Secretary” throughout (4)(a) and (b); and extended the repealer provision from “July 1, 2012” to “July 1, 2015” in (5).

The 2014 amendment, in (1)(a), inserted “or Cancellation” following “Company Name or Transfer.”

The 2015 amendment deleted the former repealer provision in (5), which read “This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2015.”

The 2017 amendment, effective June 23, 2017, added (5) and (6).

Issuance of registration to foreign limited liability company if all requisite fees specified in this section have been paid, see § 79-29-1005.

§79-29-1204.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-1204. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 87, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-1204 was entitled: Powers of Secretary of State. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1207.

§79-29-1205.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1207.
Powers of the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall have the powers reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of the Office of the Secretary of State under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1209.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 USCS Section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 USCS Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 USCS Section 7003(b).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1211.
Enforceability of written agreements to choose forum, authorize arbitration and to choose prescribed manner of service of process.

In a written operating agreement or other writing, a manager, member or officer may consent to be subject to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the courts of, or arbitration in, a specified jurisdiction, or the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of this state, or the exclusivity of arbitration in a specified jurisdiction or in this state, and to be served with legal process in the manner prescribed in such operating agreement or other writing.Except by agreeing to arbitrate any arbitrable matter in a specified jurisdiction or in this state, a member who is not a manager may not waive its right to maintain a legal action or proceeding in the courts of this state with respect to matters relating to the organization or internal affairs of a limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.